Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-150
Warrants; form.

All warrants shall be drawn payable to the claimant or bearer, the same as county warrants, except as otherwise herein provided.

Laws 1897, c. 86, § 6, p. 365;

R.S.1913, § 3481;

Laws 1917, c. 84, § 1, p. 198;

C.S.1922, § 2881;

Laws 1923, c. 97, § 3, p. 251;

Laws 1929, c. 131, § 1, p. 483;

C.S.1929, § 46-126;

R.S.1943, § 46-150.

For provisions as to interest on warrants, see section 45-106.

Warrants issued by officers of irrigation district prior to levy and when no fund exists are void. Elliott v. Calamus Irr. Dist., 120 Neb. 714, 235 N.W. 95 (1931).